Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3517
Criminal justice agency; criminal history record information; process; assure accuracy.

Each criminal justice agency shall institute a process of data collection, entry, storage, and systematic audit of criminal history record information that will minimize the possibility of recording and storing inaccurate information. Any criminal justice agency which finds that it has reported inaccurate information of a material nature shall forthwith notify each criminal justice agency known to have received such information. Each criminal justice agency shall (1) maintain a listing of the individuals or agencies both in and outside of the state to which criminal history record information was released, a record of what information was released, and the date such information was released, (2) establish a delinquent disposition monitoring system, and (3) verify all record entries.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 19.